Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-205
Supreme Court Education Fund; created;
use; investment.

The Supreme Court Education Fund is created.
The State Court Administrator shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist
of money remitted pursuant to section 33-154. The fund shall only be used
to aid in supporting the mandatory training and education program for judges
and employees of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, district courts, separate
juvenile courts, county courts, and Nebraska Probation System as enacted by
rule of the Supreme Court.

On July 1, 2014, or as soon thereafter
as administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred
nine thousand three hundred eighty-three dollars from the Supreme Court Education
Fund to the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges as an offset to the increase
in the state's contribution to the Nebraska Judges Retirement System.

Any money
in the Supreme Court Education Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 1;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB906, § 13.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.